District of Columbia statutes.
1-141

Findings.

The Council of the District of Columbia finds that:

(1)

Section 2 of a joint resolution to codify and emphasize existing rules and customs pertaining to the display and use of the flag of the United States of America (36 U.S.C. § 174) [revised; now see 4 U.S.C. § 6] addresses the method, time, and places for the display of the United States flag:

(A)

The flag should be hoisted briskly and lowered ceremoniously.

(B)

It is the universal custom to display the flag only from sunrise to sunset on buildings and stationary flagstaffs in the open. When a patriotic effect is desired, however, the flag may be displayed 24 hours a day if properly illuminated during the hours of darkness.

(C)

The flag should not be displayed on days when the weather is inclement, except when an all-weather flag is displayed.

(D)

The flag should be displayed on all days, especially on those days designated as federal and state holidays.

(E)

The flag should be displayed daily on or near the main administration building of every public institution.

(F)

The flag should be displayed in or near every polling place on election days.

(G)

The flag should be displayed during school days in or near every schoolhouse.

(2)

The display of the District of Columbia flag will inculcate a spirit of patriotism in our citizens.

July 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-121, § 2, 29 DCR 2072
1981 Ed., § 1-121.
For temporary (90 day) establishment of advisory commission, see § 2 of Flag Design Advisory Commission Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-424, July 17, 2002, 49 DCR 7627).
For temporary (90 day) establishment of a Flag Design Advisory Commission, see § 2 of Flag Design Advisory Commission Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-538, December 2, 2002, 49 DCR 11653).
For temporary (90 day) establishment of the Flag Design Advisory Commission, see § 2 of Flag Design Advisory Commission Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-6, January 27, 2003, 50 DCR 1455).